Hawaii statutes.
§201-13.8 Data or information collection.
(a) The director, in consultation with all affected governmental agencies,
shall assess the need for statistics and other information as to the number,
characteristics, needs, and movement of people into, out of, or within Hawaii,
including residents, migrants, and visitors, and such other information as the
director may deem necessary, for the purposes of sound economic research and
analysis. The director shall be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and disseminating
such information to governmental agencies on a timely basis, and is authorized
to use any appropriate method to collect the information, including but not
limited to conducting an entry and exit census or survey of all individuals
entering, leaving, or living within the State, and obtaining data or
information acquired by other agencies, both public and private. All
governmental agencies shall cooperate with and assist the director to implement
this section.

(b) To the extent that it is identifiable to
an individual, information obtained by the department or its agents through
surveys, questionnaires, or other information gathering efforts shall be held
confidential and not disclosed or opened to public inspection, except that such
information may be shared with other government agencies as provided in section
92F-19.

(c) Public disclosure of information gathered
by the department could place businesses at a competitive disadvantage.
Consequently, where disclosure would result in the impairment of the
department's ability to obtain such information and the frustration of a
legitimate government function, the department may withhold from public
disclosure competitively sensitive information including:

(1) Completed survey and questionnaire forms;

(2) Coding sheets; and

(3) Database records of such information.

(d) The director may adopt necessary rules
pursuant to chapter 91, to administer this section. [L 1987, c 336, pt of §2;
am L 1998, c 156, §7]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next